Utah, session 2026, SB320.
Section 1. Section 53G-7-228 is enacted to read:53G-7-228. After school food program.(1)As used in this section:(a)(i)"School based food pantry" means a location within or near a public school that distributes food for students and families to consume outside of a school day.(ii)"School-based food pantry" includes a teen center located within a public school.(b)"Teen center" means a location within a public school that provides a student with support services, including access to a food pantry. (2)If an LEA participates as a distribution point for a school-based food pantry, the LEA may not:(a)deny a student who is younger than 18 years old or a parent of the student from receiving a school-based food pantry item; or(b)if the student is 18 years old or older, require the student to provide evidence of lawful presence in the United States to receive a school-based food pantry item.(3)Sections 53G-9-205.2, 63G-12-402, and 76-14-207 do not apply to a school-based food pantry item, whether a school-based food pantry is administered by an LEA, a state agency, a non-profit or for profit organization, or any other political subdivision of the state that receives or administers state or federal funds to fulfill the purposes of a school-based food pantry.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53G-9-205.2 is amended to read:53G-9-205.2. Definitions -- Prohibited food additives -- Exceptions.(1)As used in this section:(a)"FDC" means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetics Act, 21 C.F.R. Part 74.(b)"Public school" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-9-205.1.(c)"School day" means the same as that termsterm is defined in Section 53G-6-201.(2)(a)Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, a public school may not sell, donate, offer, or serve on school grounds during the school day, food that contains:(i)potassium bromate;(ii)propylparaben;(iii)FDC Blue No. 1;(iv)FDC Blue No. 2;(v)FDC Green No. 3;(vi)FDC Red No. 3;(vii)FDC Red No. 40;(viii)FDC Yellow No. 5; and(ix)FDC Yellow No. 6.(b)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a person who sells, donates, offers, or serves a consumable item during the school day shall comply with the requirements under this section.(3)(a)Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(b):(i)a student's parent may provide students with a food item described in Subsection (2)(a) during the school day;(ii)a teacher may provide students with a food item described in Subsection (2)(a) if the teacher obtains permission from the students' parents at the start of each school semester; and(iii)a person may sell a food item described in Subsection (2)(a):(A)as a concession item at a school-sponsored event or extra-curricular activity; or(B)in a vending machine.(b)This section does not apply to: (i)a charter school or school district that has 5,500 students or fewer.; or(ii)an item distributed through a school-based food pantry, as that term is defined in Section 53G-7-228.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.